Arkansas, session 2025, SB167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(b)(1), concerning a request for a
student to transfer from his or her resident district or public school to
another school district or public school under the Arkansas Opportunity
Public School Choice Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Upon the request of a parent, guardian, or student, if the
student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, a student may transfer from
his or her resident district or public school to another a nonresident school
district or another public school under this section if, at the time of the
request under this subdivision (b)(1):
(A) Either:
(i) The resident public school district has been
classified by the state board as a public school district in need of Level 5
*TNL099*
03-12-2025 13:46:04 TNL099

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H3/12/25 SB167
— Intensive support under § 6-15-2913 or § 6-15-2915; or
(ii) The resident public school has a rating of “F”
under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and state board rules, as allowed in
subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i)(b) of this section; and
(B) Except as provided in subsection (n) of this section,
the parent, guardian, or student, if the student is eighteen (18) years of
age or older, has notified both the resident and nonresident school districts
of the request for a transfer no earlier than January 1 and no later than May
1 June 1 of the school year before the school year in which the student
intends to transfer.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(b)(3)(A), concerning notification
of public school transfers options to students enrolled in or assigned to
certain public school districts under the Arkansas Opportunity Public School
Choice Act, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) For each student enrolled in or assigned to a public
school district that is classified by the state board as a public school
district in need of Level 5 — Intensive support under § 6-15-2913 or § 6-15-
2915 or a public school that has a rating of “F” under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-
2106 and state board rules, a school district shall:
(i) Timely notify the parent, guardian, or student
if the student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, as soon as practicable
after the designation is made, of all options available under this section;
and
(ii)(a) Offer the parent, guardian, or student if
the student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, an opportunity to submit
an application no earlier than January 1 and no later than May 1 June 1 to
enroll the student in the upcoming school year in any public school district
that is not classified by the state board as a public school district in need
of Level 5 — Intensive support under §§ 6-15-2913 and 6-15-2915 § 6-15-2913
or § 6-15-2915 or a public school within the resident district that does not
have a rating of “F” under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and state board rules.
(b) The opportunity to continue attending the
public school or school district that the student transfers to under this
section remains in effect until the student graduates from high school.

03-12-2025 13:46:04 TNL099

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H3/12/25 SB167
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(d)(2)(C) and (D), concerning
notification to a student of his or her transfer into a nonresident district
under the Arkansas Opportunity Public School Choice Act, are amended to read
as follows:
(C) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii) of
this section, by July 1 of the school year in which the student seeks to
enroll in a nonresident district, the nonresident district shall notify the
parent or guardian of the student and the resident district in writing as to
whether the student's application has been accepted or rejected.
(D) If the parent or guardian of the student has applied
to attend a school within the student's resident district, the resident
district shall notify the parent or guardian of the student in writing as to
whether the student's application has been accepted or rejected by July 1.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(m)(2)(D), concerning a Changing
Schools/Athletic Participation form required under the Arkansas Opportunity
Public School Choice Act, is amended to read as follows:
(D) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form shall
be used only for eligibility determination of a student who transfers to
another public school or nonresident school district under this section and
is enrolled in the receiving school district by July 1 before the student
enters grades seven through twelve (7-12).

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-18-233(d), concerning the deadline by
which a request by a foster child to transfer to another public school or
public school district shall be submitted, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) A request to transfer under subsection (c) of this section
shall be:
(A) Made on a form approved by the division; and
(B) Postmarked no later than May 1 June 1 of the year in
which the student seeks to begin the fall semester at the public school
district.
(2)(A) By July 1 of the school year in which the student seeks
to transfer under this section, the superintendent of the public school
district shall notify the foster parent or the foster child, if the foster
child is over eighteen (18) years of age, in writing as to whether the foster
03-12-2025 13:46:04 TNL099

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H3/12/25 SB167
child's application has been accepted or rejected.
(B)(i) If the application is rejected, the superintendent
of the public school district shall state in the notification letter the
reason for rejection.
(ii) If the application is accepted, the
superintendent of the public school district shall state in the notification
letter a reasonable deadline by which the foster child shall enroll in the
public school district and after which the acceptance notification is null.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1904(f)(2)(D), concerning a Changing
Schools/Athletic Participation form under the Public School Choice Act of
2015, is amended to read as follows:
(D) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form shall
be used only for eligibility determination of a student who transfers to
another public school or nonresident school district under this subchapter
and is enrolled in the receiving school district by July 1 before the student
enters grades seven through twelve (7-12).

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1905(a)(1), concerning an application
to transfer under the Public School Choice Act of 2015, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) An application under this section shall be accepted no earlier
than January 1 and no later than May 1 June 1 each year.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1905(a)(3), concerning the date by
which a student shall submit an application to transfer under the Public
School Choice Act of 2015, is amended to read as follows:
(3) If a student seeks to attend a school in a nonresident
district, the student's parent or guardian, or a student who is eighteen (18)
years of age or older, shall submit an application:
(A) To the nonresident district and to the student's
resident district;
(B) On a form approved by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education; and
(C) Postmarked or delivered no later than May 1 June 1 of
the year in which the student seeks to begin the fall semester at the
03-12-2025 13:46:04 TNL099

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H3/12/25 SB167
nonresident district, except as otherwise provided for dependents of
uniformed service members and uniformed service veterans under this
subchapter.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1905(e)(1), concerning the date by
which a nonresident district shall notify a student of his or her transfer
application's acceptance or rejection under the Public School Choice Act of
2015, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) By July 1 of the school year in which a student seeks to enroll
in a nonresident district under this subchapter, the superintendent of the
nonresident district shall notify the student's parent or guardian and the
resident district in writing as to whether the student's application has been
accepted or rejected.

/s/A. Clark





















03-12-2025 13:46:04 TNL099